Washington statutes.
RCW 43.23.050

Powers and duties.

The director of agriculture shall:

(1) Exercise all the powers and perform all the duties prescribed by law relating to horticulture, and horticultural plants and products;

(2) Enforce and supervise the administration of all laws relating to horticulture, horticultural products, and horticultural interests.

[ 1983 c 248 s 6; 1967 c 240 s 5; 1965 c 8 s 43.23.050. Prior: 1921 c 7 s 91; RRS s 10849.]

NOTES:

Horticultural

pests and diseases: Chapter 15.08 RCW.

plants, Christmas trees, and facilities: Chapter 15.13 RCW.